District of Columbia statutes.
16-1123

Judgment for defendant after plaintiff’s refusal to pay excess or tender deed.

If the plaintiff fails or refuses either to pay the defendant the excess of the value of the improvements over the amount of the plaintiff’s damages, or, as provided by the chapter, to tender a deed to the defendant and accept from him the value of the plaintiff’s property, exclusive of the improvements, the defendant may pay the value into court for the use of the plaintiff. Thereupon, the defendant shall be entitled to a judgment in his favor, but without costs, which judgment shall be a bar to any future action by the plaintiff against the defendant to recover the property for cause theretofore existing.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1123.
1973 Ed., § 16-1123.